Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2221
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Highway Bond Act is supplemental to existing statutes and shall not be construed as repealing or amending existing statutes but shall be construed harmoniously and implemented compatibly with them.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 21, p. 1113;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 14.